utilities/dictionaries/ltg_LTG-Latgalian.dic
agresivs/WY
aizdūmeigs/WY
aizrauteigs/WY
aktivs/WY-
aktuals/WY-
apcereigs/WY
apdūmeigs/WY-
apjiemeigs/WY
apjūmeigs/WY
apkiereigs/WY-
apsvīdeigs/WY-
apzineigs/WY-
arheologiskys/WY-
atbildeigs/WY-
atbiļdeigs/WY
atbiļsteigs/WY-
atkareigs/WY-
atsauceigs/WY-
attapeigs/WY-
attīceigs/WY
attureigs/WY
augleigs/WY-
augstpruoteigs/WY
augstražeigs/WY
augstsirdeigs/WY
augsts/WY-
augstvierteigs/WY
augšejs/WY
autentiskys/WY
automatiskys/WY
ārrts/WY-
badeigs/WY
baileigs/WY
baismeigs/WY
bednys/WY
bejeigs/WY
bezcereigs/WY
bezdibineigs/WY
bezdīveigs/WY
bezgaleigs/WY
bezjiedzeigs/WY
bezkaisleigs/WY
bezkauneigs/WY
bezpaleidzeigs/WY
bezpruoteigs/WY
bezryupeigs/WY
bezsakareigs/WY
bezvaineigs/WY
bezveideigs/WY
biedeigs/WY
bierniškeigs/WY
blāgs/WY
bogots/WY
boguoteigs/WY
boguots/WY
bramaneigs/WY
breineigs/WY
breiniškeigs/WY
breivpruoteigs/WY
breivs/WY-
brīsmeigs/WY
burveigs/WY
būglys/WY
catūrts/w
cādrys/WY
cāls/WY
ceists/WY
cereigs/WY
cesnys/WY
ciļvieceigs/WY-
cīneigs/WY-
cīts/WY
čaugrons/WY
četrdesmit/w
četri/w
četrpadsmit/w
čudnys/WY
dabeigs/WY-
dails/WY
darbeigs/WY
daudzgadeigs/WY
daudzkuorteigs/WY
daudznūzeimeigs/WY
daudzpuseigs/WY
daudzveideigs/WY
dedzeigs/WY
dereigs/WY-
desmit/w
deveigs/WY
deveni/w
deveņdesmit/w
deveņpadsmit/w
diejeigs/WY
divdaleigs/WY
divdesmit/w
divgadeigs/WY
divi/w
divpadsmit/w
divstuoveigs/WY
dižciļteigs/WY
dīks/WY
dīveigs/WY
draudeigs/WY
draudzeigs/WY-
drausmeigs/WY
drebeleigs/WY
dreizs/WY-
dryums/WY
drūsmeigs/WY
drūss/WY-
duorgs/WY-
dusmeigs/WY
dūbains/WY-
dūmeigs/WY
dūrsteigs/WY
dūšeigs/WY
dzeiveigs/WY
dzeivs/WY-
dzeivuotspiejeigs/WY
dzeļziņs/Z
dzieleigs/WY
dzierdeigs/WY-
dziļdūmeigs/WY
dziļs/WY-
eislaiceigs/WY
eiss/WY-
elasteigs/WY-
gaišs/WY
galeigs/WY
gars/WY-
garšeigs/WY-
gādnys/WY-
godnys/WY-
gords/WY-
greizsirdeigs/WY
grieceigs/WY
gryuts/WY
grīzeigs/WY
groznys/WY
gudrys/WY-
gūdeigs/WY-
ilggadeigs/WY
ilgtspiejeigs/WY
indeigs/WY
itaids/X
izdeveigs/WY-
izklaideigs/WY
izlaideigs/WY
izmiseigs/WY
izpaleidzeigs/WY
izskateigs/WY-
izškireigs/WY-
izteiksmeigs/WY-
iztureigs/WY-
izvaireigs/WY
īdarbeigs/WY-
īdereigs/WY-
īdūmeigs/WY
ījiuteigs/WY-
īspaideigs/WY
ītekmeigs/WY-
ītīpeigs/WY-
jauns/WY
jautrys/WY
jiedzeigs/WY-
jiusmeigs/WY
jiuteigs/WY-
jyuteigs/WY-
jūceigs/WY
kaids/X
kaisleigs/WY
kaismeigs/WY
kaiteigs/WY-
kauneigs/WY-
klaidains/WY
klasisks/WY
kluss/WY
komplekss/WY
konkrets/WY-
korstasineigs/WY
korsts/WY
kruosains/WY-
krušs/WY
krūpleigs/WY
kuoreigs/WY-
kuorteigs/WY-
kupsains/WY
kurs/Xy
kusteigs/WY-
kūciņs/Z
kūduleigs/WY
kūpeigs/WY
laiceigs/WY
laikmeteigs/WY-
laimeigs/WY-
laipneigs/WY
latgalisks/WY
lāns/WY
lātticeigs/WY
leidzcīteigs/WY
leidzdaleigs/WY
leidzeigs/WY
leidzons/WY-
leidzvierteigs/WY
leigons/WY
lels/WY-
lieneigs/WY
liktineigs/WY
lipeigs/WY
literars/WY-
lykumeigs/WY-
lykumsakareigs/WY
līkuleigs/WY
līleigs/WY
lītdereigs/WY-
lobpruoteigs/WY-
lobsirdeigs/WY
lobs/WY-
lobvieleigs/WY-
logisks/WY-
maineigs/WY-
malns/WY
maļdeigs/WY-
maneigs/WY
meiksts/WY
meils/WY
meistareigs/WY
meļneigs/WY
mežūneigs/WY
miersteigs/WY-
miļjards/w
miļjons/w
miļzeigs/WY
myusdīneigs/WY-
myužeigs/WY
mīleigs/WY-
mīls/WY
mīreigs/WY-
mīseigs/WY
modnys/WY
mosnys/WY
mozgadeigs/WY
mozkaiteigs/WY
moznūzeimeigs/WY
mozsvareigs/WY
mozs/WY
moztureigs/WY
mudeigs/WY
muns/Xy
muojeigs/WY-
muoksleigs/WY
muolains/WY
muoliņs/Z
muolojs/WY
muoneigs/WY
muoņticeigs/WY
muteigs/WY
mūdeigs/WY-
naatlaideigs/WY
nabadzeigs/WY
nabogs/WY
nadzeigs/WY
nagribeigs/WY
naideigs/WY
naksneigs/WY
namaļdeigs/WY
namuokuleigs/WY
narimteigs/WY
nasamaneigs/WY
nasaprateigs/WY
navaleigs/WY
navareigs/WY
nazkaids/X
nazkurs/Xy
nežnys/WY
nikaids/X
nīceigs/WY
normals/WY-
nūdereigs/WY-
nūdeveigs/WY
nūtureigs/WY-
nūzeimeigs/WY-
omuleigs/WY-
opols/WY-
ostoni/w
ostoņdesmit/w
ostoņpadsmit/w
pacīteigs/WY-
padeveigs/WY-
paklauseigs/WY-
pakļōveigs/WY-
paleidzeigs/WY-
pamateigs/WY
pareizs/WY-
pareizticeigs/WY
pasauleigs/WY
pasivs/WY
pastuoveigs/WY-
pateiceigs/WY-
patīseigs/WY-
patstuoveigs/WY-
pavasareigs/WY
pazemeigs/WY
personeigs/WY
piļneigs/WY-
pylngadeigs/WY-
pylns/WY-
pylnvierteigs/WY-
pīcdesmit/w
pīci/w
pīcpadsmit/w
pīdareigs/WY-
pīdīneigs/WY-
pīkluojeigs/WY-
pīkuopeigs/WY-
pīneigs/WY
pīnuoceigs/WY-
pīsardzeigs/WY-
pīticeigs/WY-
pīviļceigs/WY-
pleceigs/WY
plyks/WY
ploskons/WY
pošaizlīdzeigs/WY
pošrūceigs/WY
praseigs/WY-
prasmeigs/WY-
prīceigs/WY
progoreigs/WY
pruoteigs/WY-
rasnys/WY
rauduleigs/WY
ražeigs/WY
redzeigs/WY-
rikteigs/WY-
ryupeigs/WY-
rībeigs/WY
romons/WY
rudineigs/WY
runeigs/WY-
runuoteigs/WY
rups/WY
rūseigs/WY
sakareigs/WY-
sapaseigs/WY-
sapruoteigs/WY-
sarkaneigs/WY
saskaneigs/WY-
saticeigs/WY-
satureigs/WY-
saudzeigs/WY-
sauss/WY
sekmeigs/WY-
senejs/WY
septeni/w
septeņdesmit/w
septeņpadsmit/w
sešdesmit/w
sešgadeigs/WY
seši/w
sešpadsmit/w
sevkurs/Xy
siereigs/WY
simpatiskys/WY-
sirdeigs/WY
sirsneigs/WY
sylts/WY
symtgadeigs/WY
symtprocenteigs/WY
symts/w
syudeigs/WY
syurs/WY
sīviškeigs/WY-
skaidrys/WY-
skaists/WY-
skaneigs/WY-
skumeigs/WY
skuobs/WY
skuordiņs/Z
slains/WY
slapyns/WY
slauns/WY-
slāsnys/WY
sleideigs/WY-
slydnys/WY
slyms/WY
slynks/WY
slovons/WY
smaideigs/WY
smeļdzeigs/WY
smierteigs/WY
smirdeigs/WY-
smīkleigs/WY-
smogs/WY-
smuordeigs/WY-
soldons/WY
solts/WY
sovdabeigs/WY
sovlaiceigs/Wy
sovpateigs/WY
sovs/Xy
sovvaleigs/WY
spareigs/WY
specials/WY
speideigs/WY
speiteigs/WY
spieceigs/WY
spiejeigs/WY-
spitaleigs/WY
spūdrys/WY
stātnys/WY
steidzeigs/WY-
streideigs/WY
struodeigs/WY
suleigs/WY
suojs/WY
suolejs/WY
suopeigs/WY-
suotnys/WY
suteigs/WY
svareigs/WY-
svātsvineigs/WY
svieteigs/WY-
svineigs/WY-
šaurs/WY
šausmeigs/WY
šivereigs/WY
škeists/WY
šmaigs/WY
špetnys/WY
šustrys/WY
švaks/WY
taids/X-
taisneigs/WY-
talanteigs/WY-
tamleidzeigs/WY
taupeigs/WY-
teirs/WY-
ticeigs/WY-
tykumeigs/WY-
tymss/WY
tīpeigs/WY
tīseigs/WY-
tīvs/WY
tovs/Xy
traps/WY
treisdesmit/w
treispadsmit/w
treis/w
triļjons/w
tryuceigs/WY
truopeigs/WY-
tuoleims/WY
tūksteigs/WY
uorysks/WY
uzmaneigs/WY-
vacmūdeigs/WY
vacs/WY
vaineigs/WY-
vardarbeigs/WY-
vāls/WY
veseleigs/WY-
vierteigs/WY-
vysaids/WY
vīgls/WY
vīnbaļseigs/WY-
vīneigs/WY
vīnnūzeimeigs/WY-
vīnpadsmit/w
vīnpuseigs/WY-
vīns/w
voldūneigs/WY
vuojs/WY
zaļs/WY
zeimeigs/WY-
ziņkuoreigs/WY
žipereigs/WY
